en: Biokreis
de: Biokreis
fr: Biokreis

en: Sustainable farming
fr: Agriculture durable

en: UTZ Certified Coffee
de: UTZ Certified Kaffee

en: Vegetarian, Suitable for vegetarians
da: Vegetarisk
de: Vegetarisch
es: Vegetariano, Producto vegetariano, Apto para vegetarianos, Vegetarian
fr: Végétarien, Convient aux végétariens, Adapté au régime végétarien
it: Vegetariano
nl: Vegetarisch
pt: Vegetariano

en: Vegan, Suitable for vegans, Vegan formula
da: Vegansk
de: Vegan
es: Vegano, Producto vegano, Vegan
fr: Végétalien, Végan, végétal
it: Vegano, Vegan
nl: Veganistisch
pt: Vegano, Producto vegano, Vegan
th: สูตรเจ

en: FSC, Forest Stewardship Council
es: FSC, Forest Stewardship Council, Consejo de Administración Forestal

en: No animal derived ingredients
ar: بدون مكونات مشتقة من الحيوانات
az: Heyvan mənşəli inqrediyent yoxdur
bg: Без съставки от животински произход
bn: কোন প্রাণী থেকে উদ্ভূত উপাদান নেই
cs: Bez složek živočišného původu
da: Ingen animalske ingredienser
de: Keine Inhaltsstoffe tierischen Ursprungs
el: Χωρίς συστατικά ζωικής προέλευσης
es: Sin ingredientes derivados de animales
et: Ei ole loomset päritolu koostisosi
fa: بدون مواد مشتق شده از حیوانات
fi: Ei eläinperäisiä ainesosia
fr: Pas de composant animal, Sans matière animale
ga: Gan comhábhair a dhíorthaítear ó ainmhithe
gu: કોઈ પ્રાણીમાંથી મેળવેલ ઘટકો નથી
he: ללא רכיבים שמקורם מן החי
hr: Bez sastojaka životinjskog podrijetla
hu: Nincsenek állati eredetű összetevők
id: Tidak ada bahan yang berasal dari hewan
is: Engin innihaldsefni úr dýrum
it: Nessun ingrediente di origine animale
ja: 動物由来の成分は含まれていません
ka: ცხოველური წარმოშობის ინგრედიენტების გარეშე
kk: Жануарлардан алынған ингредиенттер жоқ
km: គ្មានគ្រឿងផ្សំដែលបានមកពីសត្វ
kn: ಯಾವುದೇ ಪ್ರಾಣಿಗಳಿಂದ ಪಡೆದ ಪದಾರ್ಥಗಳಿಲ್ಲ
ko: 동물 유래 성분 없음
ky: Жаныбарлардан алынган ингредиенттер жок
lt: Be gyvūninės kilmės ingredientų
lv: Bez dzīvnieku izcelsmes sastāvdaļām
ml: മൃഗങ്ങളിൽ നിന്ന് ഉത്പാദിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ചേരുവകൾ ഇല്ല
mn: Амьтнаас гаралтай орц байхгүй
mr: कोणत्याही प्राणीजन्य घटकांशिवाय
ms: Tiada bahan terbitan haiwan
mt: L-ebda ingredjenti derivati mill-annimali
ne: कुनै पनि जनावरबाट प्राप्त सामग्रीहरू छैनन्
nl: Geen ingrediënten van dierlijke oorsprong
no: Ingen animalske ingredienser
or: କୌଣସି ପଶୁ ଉତ୍ପାଦିତ ଉପାଦାନ ନାହିଁ
pa: ਕੋਈ ਜਾਨਵਰਾਂ ਤੋਂ ਪ੍ਰਾਪਤ ਕੀਤੀ ਸਮੱਗਰੀ ਨਹੀਂ ਹੈ
pl: Bez składników pochodzenia zwierzęcego
pt: Sem ingredientes derivados de animais
ro: Fără ingrediente derivate din animale
ru: Без ингредиентов животного происхождения
si: සත්ව සම්භවයක් ඇති අමුද්‍රව්‍ය නොමැත
sk: Bez zložiek živočíšneho pôvodu
sl: Brez sestavin živalskega izvora
sq: Pa përbërës me origjinë shtazore
sr: Bez sastojaka životinjskog porekla
sv: Inga ingredienser från djur
sw: Hakuna viambato vinavyotokana na wanyama
ta: எந்த விலங்குகளிடமிருந்து பெறப்பட்ட பொருட்களும் இல்லை
te: జంతువుల నుండి పొందిన పదార్థాలు లేవు
tg: Ҳеҷ гуна компонентҳои аз ҳайвонот гирифташуда нест
th: ไม่มีส่วนผสมที่มาจากสัตว์
tk: Haýwanlardan alynýan maddalar ýok
tl: Walang sangkap na nagmula sa hayop
tr: Hayvansal kaynaklı içerik yok
uk: Без інгредієнтів тваринного походження
uz: Hayvonlardan olingan ingredientlar yo'q
vi: Không có thành phần có nguồn gốc từ động vật

en: Without animal fat
de: Ohne tierisches Fett
es: Sin grasa animal
fr: Sans graisse animale, sans graisses animales
it: Senza grassi animali
ja: 動物性脂肪不使用
ko: 동물성 지방 없음
nl: Zonder dierlijk vet
pt: Sem gordura animal

en: Without bisphenol
ar: بدون بيسفينول
az: Bisfenolsiz
bg: Без бисфенол
bn: বিসফেনল ছাড়া
cs: Bez bisfenolu
da: Uden bisphenol
de: Ohne Bisphenol
el: Χωρίς δισφαινόλη
es: Sin bisfenol
et: Bisfenoolivaba
fa: بدون بیسفنول
fi: Ilman bisfenolia
fr: Sans bisphenol
ga: Gan bisphenol
gu: બિસ્ફેનોલ વગર
he: ללא ביספנול
hr: Bez bisfenola
hu: Biszfenol nélkül
id: Tanpa bisfenol
is: Án bisfenóls
it: Senza bisfenolo
ja: ビスフェノール不使用
ka: ბისფენოლის გარეშე
kk: Бисфенолсыз
km: គ្មានប៊ីសហ្វេណុល
kn: ಬಿಸ್ಫೆನಾಲ್ ಇಲ್ಲದೆ
ko: 비스페놀 없음
ky: Бисфенолсуз
lt: Be bisfenolio
lv: Bez bisfenola
ml: ബിസ്ഫെനോൾ ഇല്ലാതെ
mn: Бисфенолгүй
mr: बिस्फेनॉलशिवाय
ms: Tanpa bisfenol
mt: Mingħajr bisfenol
ne: बिस्फेनोल बिना
nl: Zonder bisfenol
no: Uten bisfenol
or: ବିସଫେନଲ୍ ବିନା
pa: ਬਿਸਫੇਨੋਲ ਤੋਂ ਬਿਨਾਂ
pl: Bez bisfenolu
pt: Sem bisfenol
ro: Fără bisfenol
ru: Без бисфенола
si: බිස්ෆෙනෝල් රහිත
sk: Bez bisfenolu
sl: Brez bisfenola
sq: Pa bisfenol
sr: Bez bisfenola
sv: Utan bisfenol
sw: Bila bisphenoli
ta: பிஸ்பெனால் இல்லாமல்
te: బిస్ఫెనాల్ లేకుండా
tg: Бе бисфенол
th: ไม่มีบิสฟีนอล
tk: Bisfenolsyz
tl: Walang bisphenol
tr: Bisfenol olmadan
uk: Без бісфенолу
uz: Bisfenolsiz
vi: Không chứa bisphenol

en: PEFC, Pan European Forest Certification, Program for the Endorsement of Forest Certification, Program for the Endorsement of Forest Certification schemes
fr: PEFC

en: FSC Mix
fr: FSC Mix, FSC Mixte

en: BDIH
fr: BDIH, Cosmétiques naturels certifiés BDIH, BDIH Cosmétiques naturels certifiés

en: One Voice
fr: One Voice, One Voice - pour une éthique animale et planétaire

xx: Nordic Swan Ecolabel, Nordic Ecolabel
en: Nordic Swan Ecolabel, Nordic Ecolabel
da: Svanemærket, Nordisk miljømærkning
fi: Joutsenmerkki, pohjoismainen ympäristömerkki, ympäristömerkki, ympäristömerkki miljömärkt
fr: Écolabel Nordic Swan, Cygne nordique
is: Svansmerkið, Svanurinn, Umhverfismerkið Svanurinn
nb: Svanemerket, miljømerket
sv: Svanenmärkt, Svanen, Svanenmärkt miljömärkt

en: Hypoallergenic
de: Hypoallergen
es: Hipoalergénico
fr: Hypoallergénique
it: Ipoallergenico
ja: 低刺激性
ko: 저자극성
nl: Hypoallergeen
pt: Hipoalergênico

xx: Astma-Allergi Danmark
en: Asthma Allergy Denmark
da: Astma-Allergi Danmark

xx: Asthma Allergy Nordic
en: Asthma Allergy Nordic

en: Not tested on animals
ar: لم يتم اختباره على الحيوانات
az: Heyvanlar üzərində sınaqdan keçirilməyib
bg: Не е тествано върху животни
bn: পশুদের উপর পরীক্ষিত নয়
cs: Netestováno na zvířatech
da: Ikke testet på dyr
de: Nicht an Tieren getestet
el: Δεν έχει δοκιμαστεί σε ζώα
es: No testado en animales
et: Loomadel testimata
fa: روی حیوانات آزمایش نشده است
fi: Ei testattu eläimillä
fr: Non testé sur les animaux, non testé sur des animaux
ga: Níl sé tástáilte ar ainmhithe
gu: પ્રાણીઓ પર પરીક્ષણ કરાયેલ નથી
he: לא נוסה על בעלי חיים
hr: Nije testirano na životinjama
hu: Nem tesztelték állatokon
id: Tidak diuji pada hewan
is: Ekki prófað á dýrum
it: Non testato su animali
ja: 動物実験は行われていません
ka: არ არის გამოცდილი ცხოველებზე
kk: Жануарларда сыналмаған
km: មិនបានធ្វើតេស្តលើសត្វ
kn: ಪ್ರಾಣಿಗಳ ಮೇಲೆ ಪರೀಕ್ಷಿಸಲಾಗಿಲ್ಲ
ko: 동물 실험을 하지 않음
ky: Жаныбарларда сыналган эмес
lt: Nebandyta su gyvūnais
lv: Nav testēts uz dzīvniekiem
ml: മൃഗങ്ങളിൽ പരീക്ഷിച്ചിട്ടില്ല
mn: Амьтанд туршигдаагүй
mr: जनावरांवर चाचणी केलेली नाही
ms: Tidak diuji pada haiwan
mt: Mhux ittestjat fuq l-annimali
ne: जनावरहरूमा परीक्षण गरिएको छैन
nl: Niet getest op dieren
no: Ikke testet på dyr
or: ପଶୁମାନଙ୍କ ଉପରେ ପରୀକ୍ଷା କରାଯାଇନାହିଁ
pa: ਜਾਨਵਰਾਂ 'ਤੇ ਟੈਸਟ ਨਹੀਂ ਕੀਤਾ ਗਿਆ
pl: Nietestowane na zwierzętach
pt: Não testado em animais
ro: Netestat pe animale
ru: Не тестировалось на животных
si: සතුන් මත පරීක්ෂා කර නොමැත
sk: Netestované na zvieratách
sl: Ni testirano na živalih
sq: Nuk është testuar në kafshë
sr: Nije testirano na životinjama
sv: Inte testat på djur
sw: Haijaribiwa kwa wanyama
ta: விலங்குகளிடம் சோதனை செய்யப்படவில்லை
te: జంతువులపై పరీక్షించబడలేదు
tg: Дар ҳайвонот озмуда нашудааст
th: ไม่ได้ทดสอบในสัตว์
tk: Haýwanlarda synagdan geçirilmedi
tl: Hindi nasubukan sa mga hayop
tr: Hayvanlar üzerinde test edilmemiştir
uk: Не тестувалося на тваринах
uz: Hayvonlarda sinovdan o'tkazilmagan
vi: Không thử nghiệm trên động vật

en: Neutral pH for the skin, neutral pH, ph skin neutral
ar: درجة الحموضة محايدة للبشرة، درجة الحموضة محايدة، درجة الحموضة محايدة للبشرة
az: Dəri üçün neytral pH, neytral pH, dəri üçün neytral pH
bg: Неутрално pH за кожата, неутрално pH, pH неутрално за кожата
bn: ত্বকের জন্য নিরপেক্ষ পিএইচ, নিরপেক্ষ পিএইচ, ত্বকের জন্য পিএইচ নিরপেক্ষ
cs: Neutrální pH pro pokožku, neutrální pH, pH neutrální pro pokožku
da: Neutral pH for huden, neutral pH, pH hudneutral
de: Neutraler pH-Wert für die Haut, neutraler pH-Wert, pH-Wert neutral für die Haut
el: Ουδέτερο pH για το δέρμα, ουδέτερο pH, pH ουδέτερο για το δέρμα
es: pH neutro para la piel, pH neutro, pH equilibrado para la piel
et: Neutraalne pH nahale, neutraalne pH, pH neutraalne nahale
fa: PH خنثی برای پوست، PH خنثی، PH خنثی برای پوست
fi: Neutraali pH iholle, neutraali pH, pH iholle neutraali
fr: pH neutre pour la peau, pH neutre, pH respectueux
ga: pH neodrach don chraiceann, pH neodrach, pH neodrach don chraiceann
gu: ત્વચા માટે તટસ્થ પીએચ, તટસ્થ પીએચ, ત્વચા માટે પીએચ તટસ્થ
he: רמת חומציות ניטרלית לעור, רמת חומציות ניטרלית, רמת חומציות ניטרלית לעור
hr: Neutralni pH za kožu, neutralni pH, pH neutralan za kožu
hu: Semleges pH a bőr számára, semleges pH, pH semleges a bőr számára
id: pH netral untuk kulit, pH netral, pH netral untuk kulit
is: Hlutlaust pH fyrir húðina, hlutlaust pH, pH hlutlaust fyrir húðina
it: pH neutro per la pelle, pH neutro, pH neutro per la pelle
ja: 肌にやさしいpH、中性pH、pHスキンニュートラル
ka: ნეიტრალური pH კანისთვის, ნეიტრალური pH, pH ნეიტრალური კანისთვის
kk: Тері үшін бейтарап pH, бейтарап pH, тері үшін pH бейтарап
km: pH អព្យាក្រឹតសម្រាប់ស្បែក, pH អព្យាក្រឹត, pH អព្យាក្រឹតសម្រាប់ស្បែក
kn: ಚರ್ಮಕ್ಕೆ ತಟಸ್ಥ pH, ತಟಸ್ಥ pH, ಚರ್ಮಕ್ಕೆ pH ತಟಸ್ಥ
ko: 피부에 중성 pH, 중성 pH, 피부에 pH 중성
ky: Тери үчүн нейтралдуу pH, нейтралдуу pH, тери үчүн pH нейтралдуу
lt: Neutralus pH odai, neutralus pH, pH neutralus odai
lv: Neitrāls pH ādai, neitrāls pH, pH neitrāls ādai
ml: ചർമ്മത്തിന് ന്യൂട്രൽ pH, ന്യൂട്രൽ pH, ചർമ്മത്തിന് pH ന്യൂട്രൽ
mn: Арьсны рН-ийг саармагжуулах, рН-ийг саармагжуулах, арьсны рН-ийг саармагжуулах
mr: त्वचेसाठी तटस्थ पीएच, तटस्थ पीएच, त्वचेसाठी पीएच तटस्थ
ms: pH neutral untuk kulit, pH neutral, pH neutral untuk kulit
mt: pH newtrali għall-ġilda, pH newtrali, pH newtrali għall-ġilda
ne: छालाको लागि तटस्थ पीएच, तटस्थ पीएच, छालाको लागि पीएच तटस्थ
nl: Neutrale pH-waarde voor de huid, neutrale pH-waarde, pH-waarde neutraal voor de huid
no: Nøytral pH for huden, nøytral pH, pH hudnøytral
or: ଚର୍ମ ପାଇଁ ଉଦାସୀନ pH, ଉଦାସୀନ pH, ଚର୍ମ ପାଇଁ pH ଉଦାସୀନ
pa: ਚਮੜੀ ਲਈ ਨਿਰਪੱਖ pH, ਨਿਰਪੱਖ pH, ਚਮੜੀ ਲਈ pH ਨਿਰਪੱਖ
pl: Neutralne pH dla skóry, neutralne pH, pH neutralne dla skóry
pt: pH neutro para a pele, pH neutro, pH neutro para a pele
ro: pH neutru pentru piele, pH neutru, pH neutru pentru piele
ru: Нейтральный pH для кожи, нейтральный pH, pH нейтральный для кожи
si: සම සඳහා උදාසීන pH, උදාසීන pH, සම සඳහා pH උදාසීන
sk: Neutrálne pH pre pokožku, neutrálne pH, pH neutrálne pre pokožku
sl: Nevtralni pH za kožo, nevtralni pH, pH nevtralen za kožo
sq: pH neutral për lëkurën, pH neutral, pH neutral për lëkurën
sr: Neutralni pH za kožu, neutralni pH, pH neutralan za kožu
sv: Neutralt pH-värde för huden, neutralt pH-värde, pH-värde neutralt för huden
sw: pH нейтральная для кожи, нейтральная pH, pH нейтральная для кожи
ta: சருமத்திற்கு நடுநிலையான pH, நடுநிலையான pH, சருமத்திற்கு pH நடுநிலையானது
te: చర్మానికి తటస్థ pH, తటస్థ pH, చర్మానికి pH తటస్థంగా ఉంటుంది
tg: PH-и бетараф барои пӯст, PH-и бетараф, PH-и бетараф барои пӯст
th: ค่า pH เป็นกลางสำหรับผิว, ค่า pH เป็นกลาง, ค่า pH เป็นกลางสำหรับผิว
tk: Deri üçin neýtral pH, neýtral pH, deri üçin pH neýtral
tl: Neutral na pH para sa balat, neutral na pH, pH neutral para sa balat
tr: Cilt için nötr pH, nötr pH, cilt için pH nötr
uk: Нейтральний pH для шкіри, нейтральний pH, pH нейтральний для шкіри
uz: Teri uchun neytral pH, neytral pH, teri uchun pH neytral
vi: Độ pH trung tính cho da, độ pH trung tính, độ pH trung tính cho da

en: Dermatologically tested, Dermatologically approved, Tested by dermatologists, Dermo tested
ar: تم اختباره من قبل أطباء الجلدية
az: Dermatoloji testindən keçmişdir
bg: Дерматологично тестван
bn: চর্মরোগ বিশেষজ্ঞ দ্বারা পরীক্ষিত
cs: Dermatologicky testováno
da: Dermatologisk testet
de: Dermatologisch getestet, Dermatologisch geprüft
el: Δερματολογικά ελεγμένο
es: Dermatológicamente testado, Testado dermatológicamente
et: Dermatoloogiliselt testitud
fa: تست شده توسط متخصصین پوست
fi: Dermatologisesti testattu
fr: Testé dermatologiquement, Testé dermatologiquemment, Testé sous controle dermatologique, Tolérance testée sous controle dermatologique, Tolerance-cutanee-testee-dermatologiquement, Tolerance-cutanee-testee-sous-controle-dermatologique, testée dermatologiquement, testées dermatologiquement, Approuvé dermatologiquement, dermato-testé
ga: Tástáladh deirmeolaíochta air
gu: ત્વચારોગ વિજ્ઞાની દ્વારા પરીક્ષણ કરાયેલ
he: נבדק דרמטולוגית
hr: Dermatološki testirano
hu: Bőrgyógyászatilag tesztelt
id: Telah diuji secara dermatologis
is: Húðfræðilega prófað
it: Dermatologicamente testato
ja: 皮膚科学的にテスト済み
ka: დერმატოლოგიურად შემოწმებულია
kk: Дерматологиялық тексеруден өткен
km: បានធ្វើតេស្តដោយអ្នកជំនាញខាងស្បែក
kn: ಚರ್ಮರೋಗ ತಜ್ಞರಿಂದ ಪರೀಕ್ಷಿಸಲ್ಪಟ್ಟಿದೆ
ko: 피부과 테스트 완료
ky: Дерматологиялык жактан текшерилген
lt: Dermatologiškai patikrintas
lv: Dermatoloģiski testēts
ml: ഡെർമറ്റോളജിക്കൽ ആയി പരീക്ഷിച്ചു
mn: Арьсны эмчийн хяналтаар шалгагдсан
mr: त्वचाविज्ञानदृष्ट्या चाचणी केली
ms: Diuji secara dermatologi
mt: Ittestjat dermatoloġikament
ne: छाला रोग विशेषज्ञ द्वारा परीक्षण गरिएको
nl: Dermatologisch getest
no: Dermatologisk testet
or: ଚର୍ମରୋଗ ବିଶେଷଜ୍ଞଙ୍କ ଦ୍ୱାରା ପରୀକ୍ଷିତ
pa: ਚਮੜੀ ਵਿਗਿਆਨੀ ਦੁਆਰਾ ਪਰਖਿਆ ਗਿਆ
pl: Przebadano dermatologicznie
pt: Dermatologicamente testado
ro: Testat dermatologic
ru: Протестировано дерматологами
si: චර්ම රෝග විශේෂඥ වෛද්‍යවරයෙකු විසින් පරීක්ෂා කරන ලදී
sk: Dermatologicky testované
sl: Dermatološko preizkušeno
sq: Testuar dermatologjikisht
sr: Dermatološki testirano
sv: Dermatologiskt testad
sw: Imejaribiwa kidermatolojia
ta: தோல் மருத்துவ சோதனை செய்யப்பட்டது
te: చర్మవ్యాధి నిపుణులచే పరీక్షించబడింది
tg: Аз тарафи дерматологҳо санҷида шудааст
th: ผ่านการทดสอบโดยแพทย์ผิวหนัง
tk: Dermatologik barlagdan geçirilen
tl: Sinubukan ng mga dermatologist
tr: Dermatolojik olarak test edilmiştir
uk: Дерматологічно протестовано
uz: Dermatologik tekshiruvdan o'tgan
vi: Đã được kiểm nghiệm da liễu